src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
arveđ:a^RVrv 2SYLL_KALVED_IV ;
civkkeđ:ci^RVvkk4 2SYLL_POHTED_IV ;
juovdâđ:jyevd 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV ; ! juovˊd ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
toidâđ:toi4d 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV "kyetä" ; ! juovˊd ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
jurdeđ:ju^RVrd 2SYLL_KALVED_TV ;
kalveđ:ka^RVlv 2SYLL_KALVED ;!YAML
karveđ:ka^RVrv 2SYLL_KALVED_TV ;
kihteđ:ki^RVht 2SYLL_POHTED ;
kijtteđ:ki^RVjtt 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
kirdeđ:ki^RVrd 2SYLL_KALVED_IV ;
kopseđ:ko5^RVps 2SYLL_POHTED ;
kuoirâđ:kyei4r 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! kuoiˊr ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
kuokkâđ:kyekk4 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! kuokˊk
kuorbâđ:kyerb 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
kuorssâđ:kyerss 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! kuorˊss ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
kuorsâđ:kyers 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! kuorˊs ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
kuoskâđ:kyesk 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV ; ! kuosˊk ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
kuovlâđ:kyevl 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! kuovˊl ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
kuovzâđ:kyevz 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! kuovˊz ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
lipčeđ:li^RVpč 2SYLL_POHTED ;
livkkeđ:li^RVvkk4 2SYLL_POHTED ;
loskeđ:lo5^RVsk 2SYLL_POHTED ;
luobdâđ:lyebd 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! luobˊd ! former 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
luohčâđ:lyehč 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
luoikkâđ:lyei4kk4 2SYLL_LUOIKKAD_TV ; ! luoiˊkk as RUOTTAD but with passive
luoimâđ:lyei4m 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! luoiˊm ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
luvveđ:lu^RVvv 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
mokseđ:mo5^RVk4s 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
muovlâđ:myevl 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! muovˊl ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
mutteđ:mu^RVtt 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
nijtteđ:ni^RVjtt 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
njibžeđ:nji^RVbž 2SYLL_POHTED ;
njizzeđ:nji^RVzz 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
njulččeđ:nju^RVlčč 2SYLL_POHTED ;
njuobžâđ:njyebž 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! njuobˊž ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
njuolgâđ:njyelg 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! njuolˊg !former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
njuordâđ:njyerd 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! njuorˊd
njuoskâđ:njyesk 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV ; ! njuosˊk ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
nurdeđ:nu^RVrd 2SYLL_KALVED ;
pirrâčuoppâđ:pirrâ#čyepp 2SYLL_LUOIKKAD_TV ;
pivdeđ:pi^RVvd 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
pišteđ:pi^RVšt 2SYLL_KALVED_IV ;
pohteđ:po5^RVht^RC 2SYLL_POHTED ; !YAML poovtám, dict poovtám
puitteđ:pu^RVi4tt 2SYLL_POHTED ;
puohčâđ:pyehč 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV ; ! puohˊč ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
puovŋâđ:pyevŋ 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! puovˊŋ ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
pušteđ:pu^RVšt 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
rijdeđ:ri^RVjd 2SYLL_POHTED ;
ruoinâđ:ryei4n 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV ; ! ruoiˊn ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
ruokkâđ:ryekk4 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! ruokˊk
ruovgâđ:ryevg 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV ; ! ruovˊg !former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
ruoškâđ:ryešk 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV ; ! ruošˊk ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
savŋeđ:sa^RVvŋ 2SYLL_KALVED ;
skulččeđ:sku^RVlčč 2SYLL_POHTED ;
sohteđ:so5^RVht 2SYLL_POHTED ;
sohčeđ:so5^RVhč 2SYLL_POHTED ;
stulččeđ:stu^RVlčč 2SYLL_POHTED_IV ;
suitteđ:su^RVi4tt 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
suoksâđ:syek4s 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
suoppâđ:syepp 2SYLL_LUOIKKAD_TV ; 
suoskâđ:syesk 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! suosˊk ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
suvneđ:su^RVvn 2SYLL_POHTED ;
tuoibâđ:tyei4b 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! tuoi4ˊb ! former 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
tuoldâđ:tyeld 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV ; ! tuolˊd ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
tuolmâđ:tyelm 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! tuolˊm ¢tuolmâm ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
tuolvâđ:tyelv 2SYLL_RUOTTAD ; ! tuolˊv ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
tuostâđ:tyest 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! tuosˊt ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
tuovŋâđ:tyevŋ 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! tuovˊŋ ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
ušteđ:u^RVšt 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
vantteđ:va^RVntt 2SYLL_POHTED ;
vilššeđ:vi^RVlšš 2SYLL_POHTED_IV ;
vuoidâđ:vyei4d 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! vuoi4ˊd ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
vuoiŋâđ:vyei4ŋ 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_IV ; ! vuoiˊŋ
vuorjâđ:vyerj 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! vuorˊj ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
čuolmâđ:čyelm 2SYLL_RUOTTAD_TV ; ! čuolˊm ! former: 2SYLL_VUOLLAD
čuoppâđ:čyepp 2SYLL_LUOIKKAD_TV ; ! čuopˊp
šluvgeđ:šlu^RVvg 2SYLL_POHTED_TV ;
